Mississippi, session 2026, HB4164.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Krisi M. Wiening-Cox of Marshall County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of her conviction for the crime of Receiving Stolen Property in Marshall County, on May 18, 2009, for which she was sentenced to serve three (3) years probation under the supervision of the Mississippi Department of Corrections.  She violated probation and it was revoked.  On December 16, 2011, she was sentenced to five (5) years in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections. She was released on August 28, 2012, and discharged on July 31, 2014.  The Legislature is informed that she has since conducted herself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.